Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.165

Guardianship/conservatorship courthouse facilitator program.

A county may create a guardianship/conservatorship courthouse facilitator program to provide basic services to pro se litigants in guardianship and conservatorship cases. The legislative authority of any county may impose user fees or may impose a surcharge of up to twenty dollars, or both, on superior court cases filed under this chapter, chapter 11.90 RCW, and chapter 73.36 RCW to pay for the expenses of the guardianship/conservatorship courthouse facilitator program. Fees collected under this section shall be collected and deposited in the same manner as other county funds are collected and deposited, and shall be maintained in a separate guardianship/conservatorship courthouse facilitator account to be used as provided in this section.

[ 2019 c 437 s 133.]